Idaho, session 2026, H0681.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 19-401, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-401. NO STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS FOR CERTAIN FELONIES. Notwithstand-
ing any other provision of law, there is no limitation of time within which a
prosecution for the following crimes must be commenced:
(1) Murder;
(2) Voluntary manslaughter;
(3) Rape pursuant to section 18-6101(3) through (10), Idaho Code;
(4) Sexual abuse of a child or, lewd conduct with a child, or aggravated
lewd conduct with a child as set forth in sections 18-1506 and, 18-1508,
18-1508B, and 18-1508C, Idaho Code; or
(5) Producing or making sexually exploitative material as set forth in
section 18-1507(2)(b), Idaho Code; or
(5) (6) An act of terrorism as set forth in sections 18-8102, 18-8103,
18-3322, 18-3323 and 18-3324, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.